Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1915
License; application.

A person, including a municipal, county, or state employee, who wishes to engage in the use of instrumentation which is designed to attempt to detect truth or deception and any other person desiring to be licensed under sections 81-1901 to 81-1936 shall file an application for a license with the Secretary of State. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security number. The Secretary of State shall issue a nontransferable license to each qualified applicant. Such license shall authorize the holder to engage in the use of instrumentation designed to detect truth or deception and each license shall specify the instrument the holder is licensed to operate.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 15;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 227.